Utah statutes.
76-10-1301.   Definitions.

For the purposes of this part:

(1)  "House of prostitution" means a place where prostitution or promotion of prostitution is regularly carried on by one or more persons under the control, management, or supervision of another.

(2)  "Inmate" means a person who engages in prostitution in or through the agency of a house of prostitution.

(3)  "Public place" means any place to which the public or any substantial group of the public has access.

(4)  "Sexual activity" means acts of masturbation, sexual intercourse, or any sexual act involving the genitals of one person and the mouth or anus of another person, regardless of the sex of either participant.



Amended by Chapter 199, 1988 General Session

